lexc/noun/enhuoaeejaje.lexc
!!!enhuoa.-> enhuoaee .lexc!!!
!!This one builds ADDITIONALLY jaje for poss plural jaim, jaid, etc...
!!! All words here are in enhuoaee.lexc

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Ess 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

 +Fam +Gens +Genpl
!+Plur      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter +Tem
! +Soc  +Tem +Dis
      
§uue§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oooe§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§  §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ 
§VV§ §OEOE11§ §oeoez12§
      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;


LEXICON Poss
!+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
!+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
!+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
!+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m        Gen;  ! m
!+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d        Gen;  ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
!+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk         Gen;  ! unk, önk
!+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k Gen;  ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
!                                  Gen;

LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounszemet
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possszemet;
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurszemet;
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famszemet;

LEXICON Possszemet
!+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
!+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
!+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m        Famszemet;  ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d        Famszemet;  ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famszemet;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk         Famszemet;  ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k Famszemet;  ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famszemet;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famszemet;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famszemet;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famszemet;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famszemet;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famszemet;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famszemet;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
!                                  Famszemet1;

LEXICON Famszemet
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genszemet;
                       Genszemet;

LEXICON Genszemet
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Caseszemet;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseszemet;
                       Caseszemet;
 
LEXICON Caseszemet
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNount
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Posst;

LEXICON Posst
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik

LEXICON Noun
Hárskút AddNoun;
Mélykút AddNoun;
Somogytúr AddNount;
Vásárút AddNoun;
adagolópohár AddNount;
adatnév AddNoun;
agyiér AddNount;
aknaút AddNoun;
albínóegér AddNount;
almavasút AddNoun;
antiloptehén AddNount;
apostolnév AddNoun;
aranyér AddNount;
artézikút AddNoun;
autónév AddNoun;
bakelitfedél AddNount;
barlangkút AddNoun;
befogadólevél AddNount;
berekkút AddNoun;
bevezetőút AddNoun;
bibliafedél AddNount;
bioszemét:bioszemet AddNounszemet;
bodonkút AddNoun;
boglárkalevél AddNount;
borostyánkút AddNoun;
botnyél AddNount;
bulvárszemét:bulvárszemet AddNounszemet;
bádogkanál AddNount;
bányaalagút AddNoun;
bélsugár AddNount;
bérmaút AddNoun;
búvármadár AddNount;
bűzrúd AddNoun;
cinkanál AddNount;
családnév AddNoun;
csatornaszél AddNount;
cselekvésnév AddNoun;
csillagnév AddNoun;
csincsillanyúl AddNount;
csonttenyér AddNount;
csoportnév AddNoun;
csúcslevél AddNount;
csőalagút AddNoun;
címerfedél AddNount;
darabközép AddNoun;
disztribúciónév AddNoun;
divatlevél AddNount;
dongaút AddNoun;
dámtehén AddNount;
délközép AddNoun;
dörzskerék AddNoun;
dörzskötél AddNount;
együttesnév AddNoun;
elhordótér AddNount;
előadáskörút AddNoun;
előtér AddNount;
energiakút AddNoun;
ernyőnyél AddNount;
excenterrúd AddNoun;
ezüstnyél AddNount;
fakitűzőrúd AddNoun;
fanyél AddNount;
favágócsút AddNoun;
fejkosár AddNount;
felelősségnév AddNoun;
felmondófél AddNount;
felvonórúd AddNoun;
fesztiválszíntér AddNount;
filmalagút AddNoun;
fogságlevél AddNount;
fogórúd AddNoun;
forgóalvázrúd AddNoun;
forrásmocsár AddNount;
futárnév AddNoun;
fékdobfedél AddNount;
fémkút AddNoun;
fémszemét:fémszemet AddNounszemet;
fénysugár AddNount;
férfinév AddNoun;
fölfedezőút AddNoun;
fölözőkanál AddNount;
füstölőrúd AddNoun;
főellenfél AddNount;
főütőér AddNount;
fűtőanyagrúd AddNoun;
garattér AddNount;
gerincrúd AddNoun;
gombfedél AddNount;
gulyakút AddNoun;
gyapotmagfúróbogár AddNount;
gyorspostaút AddNoun;
gyászbogár AddNount;
gyülekezőtér AddNount;
gyümölcsnév AddNoun;
gólyamadár AddNount;
gödörkút AddNoun;
hagymatér AddNount;
hajlítórúd AddNoun;
halandzsanév AddNoun;
halfél AddNount;
hangyászbogár AddNount;
hangzónév AddNoun;
hatósugár AddNount;
hegyivasút AddNoun;
hevederrúd AddNoun;
hiánytér AddNount;
hordalékkút AddNoun;
hormonháttér AddNount;
hágóút AddNoun;
hártyaoklevél AddNount;
hév AddNoun;
hízófél AddNount;
húgyút AddNoun;
hűtőalagút AddNoun;
ideáltér AddNount;
ingófél AddNount;
inputnév AddNoun;
ispánkút AddNoun;
ivarlevél AddNount;
izotópszemét:izotópszemet AddNounszemet;
jelzésnév AddNoun;
járlatlevél AddNount;
járócserép AddNoun;
jóhírnév AddNoun;
kabinfedél AddNount;
kampósrúd AddNoun;
kanárimadár AddNount;
karbonrúd AddNoun;
karraktér AddNount;
kavicsút AddNoun;
kehelylevél AddNount;
keresztnév AddNoun;
keresztszél AddNount;
keserűvízkút AddNoun;
kialvófél AddNount;
királykamadár AddNount;
kirándulóvasút AddNoun;
kiöntőkosár AddNount;
klastromkút AddNoun;
koktélnév AddNoun;
kompkötél AddNount;
kontrollnév AddNoun;
kormánykötél AddNount;
koronáskerék AddNoun;
kucséberkosár AddNount;
kultúrkörút AddNoun;
kábelkötél AddNount;
kántorhét AddNoun;
képszemét:képszemet AddNounszemet;
képződménynév AddNoun;
kérdéslevél AddNount;
kódolásnév AddNoun;
kókuszdióbél AddNount;
köralagút AddNoun;
köszönőoklevél AddNount;
közhelyszemét:közhelyszemet AddNounszemet;
közlekedőút AddNoun;
kútnév AddNoun;
kőszamár AddNount;
lambérianút AddNoun;
lefolyóér AddNount;
lehúzórúd AddNoun;
levendulagyökér AddNount;
leányhét AddNoun;
lombfedél AddNount;
lyukközép AddNoun;
lángsugár AddNount;
lápkút AddNoun;
lépfenelevél AddNount;
lónév AddNoun;
madártér AddNount;
magasút AddNoun;
marhabél AddNount;
medencefenék AddNoun;
megindulófél AddNount;
melléknév AddNoun;
merevítőkosár AddNount;
mesevasút AddNoun;
mintaszél AddNount;
mintaút AddNoun;
mosópornév AddNoun;
mozdonyszén AddNount;
munkacsoportnév AddNoun;
málháskosár AddNount;
mártírnév AddNoun;
méhbogár AddNount;
mérlegrúd AddNoun;
műanyagkötél AddNount;
műanyagrúd AddNoun;
műút AddNoun;
napernyőnyél AddNount;
neutronsugár AddNount;
nosztalgiaút AddNoun;
nyomtatványrúd AddNoun;
nyugvófél AddNount;
nárciszlégy AddNoun;
nászlevél AddNount;
népszemét:népszemet AddNounszemet;
oktatókerék AddNoun;
olajfalevél AddNount;
olvasólevél AddNount;
országközép AddNoun;
osztályellenfél AddNount;
pacinév AddNoun;
palotatér AddNount;
papírszemét:papírszemet AddNounszemet;
parancsnév AddNoun;
parasztkenyér AddNount;
pecsenyelúd AddNoun;
pedáltér AddNount;
pincetér AddNount;
pipacserép AddNoun;
plüssegér AddNount;
pontozókerék AddNoun;
postaládaszemét:postaládaszemet AddNounszemet;
postamadár AddNount;
processzornév AddNoun;
puffertér AddNount;
puncinév AddNoun;
páncélnyúl AddNount;
pásztorlánynév AddNoun;
pókfonál AddNount;
rakodóárbocrúd AddNoun;
rakétasugár AddNount;
reklámlevél AddNount;
rektorhét AddNoun;
ribanctehén AddNount;
ritmusnév AddNoun;
rozskötél AddNount;
rácsszemét AddNoun;
rácsszemét:rácsszemet AddNounszemet;
rémhírlevél AddNount;
rézkerék AddNoun;
rögzítőkötél AddNount;
sajátnév AddNoun;
segédbevonókötél AddNount;
sikerút AddNoun;
siklótér AddNount;
sportreptér AddNount;
standardhét AddNoun;
szabványháttér AddNount;
szalonszökőkút AddNoun;
szamárnyúl AddNount;
szekrénytér AddNount;
szelepemelőrúd AddNoun;
személynév AddNoun;
szemét:szemet AddNounszemet;
szennyeskosár AddNount;
szervernév AddNoun;
szeszbogár AddNount;
szintezőrúd AddNoun;
szobaszökőkút AddNoun;
szobaúr AddNount;
szállónév AddNoun;
számtér AddNount;
szárnyrúd AddNoun;
szénsavjég AddNoun;
szétesőfél AddNount;
szótárnév AddNoun;
szörnymadár AddNount;
sárgaréparúd AddNoun;
sárkányfagyökér AddNount;
sírfenék AddNoun;
sörétkosár AddNount;
súlykerék AddNoun;
tandemkerék AddNoun;
tanlevél AddNount;
tartókerék AddNoun;
tatárjuharlevél AddNount;
tekerőrúd AddNoun;
temperszén AddNount;
terelőrúd AddNoun;
tesztlevél AddNount;
toborzókörút AddNoun;
tollsugár AddNount;
trágyázótér AddNount;
turnékörút AddNoun;
tálcatér AddNount;
távegér AddNount;
térfenék AddNoun;
tölgyfalevél AddNount;
tömegszemét:tömegszemet AddNounszemet;
törtszámnév AddNoun;
tücsökmadár AddNount;
tűzkút AddNoun;
tűzoltószekér AddNount;
utazókosár AddNount;
vakulófél AddNount;
varázsrúd AddNoun;
vastagér AddNount;
vetőfonál AddNount;
vezérlőrúd AddNoun;
villámpostalevél AddNount;
vitorlabevonókötél AddNount;
vonatnév AddNoun;
vágósugár AddNount;
várkút AddNoun;
várótér AddNount;
vívófél AddNount;
völgynév AddNoun;
zellergyökér AddNount;
zsázsalevél AddNount;
álcázókosár AddNount;
államnév AddNoun;
árpabogár AddNount;
életút AddNoun;
érkezőfél AddNount;
öbölfenék AddNoun;
öntőtér AddNount;
ürgebél AddNount;
üvegcserép AddNoun;
űrszemét:űrszemet AddNounszemet;
